Washington statutes.
RCW 43.130.020

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

(1) "Employees" includes those persons performing services for the state on a salaried or hourly basis including, but not limited to, persons in "classified service" as defined in *RCW 41.06.020(3) and those persons defined as exempt from the state civil service laws pursuant to RCW 41.06.070.

(2) The term "closure of a state facility" means the termination of services being provided by a facility operated by the department of social and health services or in conjunction with the department of natural resources, when such facility is terminated for fiscal reasons, obsolescence, or other extraordinary reasons.

(3) "Classified employees" means those employees performing classified service as defined in *RCW 41.06.020(3).

[ 1973 2nd ex.s. c 37 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.06.020 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (3) to subsection (5).